src/fst/orthography/Cyrl-to-Latn.xfscript
define bäComposeRule [ б я ] -> [ b ä ] ;
define baComposeRule [ б а ] -> [ b a ] ;
define biComposeRule [ б и ] -> [ b i ] ;
define byComposeRule [ б ы ] -> [ b y ] ;
define büComposeRule [ б ю ] -> [ b ü ] ;
define buComposeRule [ б у ] -> [ b u ] ;
define beComposeRule [ б е ] -> [ b e ] ;
define běComposeRule [ б э ] -> [ b ě ] ;
define böComposeRule [ б ё ] -> [ b ö ] ;
define boComposeRule [ б о ] -> [ b o ] ;

define väComposeRule [ в я ] -> [ v ä ] ;
define vaComposeRule [ в а ] -> [ v a ] ;
define viComposeRule [ в и ] -> [ v i ] ;
define vyComposeRule [ в ы ] -> [ v y ] ;
define vüComposeRule [ в ю ] -> [ v ü ] ;
define vuComposeRule [ в у ] -> [ v u ] ;
define veComposeRule [ в е ] -> [ v e ] ;
define věComposeRule [ в э ] -> [ v ě ] ;
define vöComposeRule [ в ё ] -> [ v ö ] ;
define voComposeRule [ в о ] -> [ v o ] ;

define gäComposeRule [ г я ] -> [ g ä ] ;
define gaComposeRule [ г а ] -> [ g a ] ;
define giComposeRule [ г и ] -> [ g i ] ;
define gyComposeRule [ г ы ] -> [ g y ] ;
define güComposeRule [ г ю ] -> [ g ü ] ;
define guComposeRule [ г у ] -> [ g u ] ;
define geComposeRule [ г е ] -> [ g e ] ;
define gěComposeRule [ г э ] -> [ g ě ] ;
define göComposeRule [ г ё ] -> [ g ö ] ;
define goComposeRule [ г о ] -> [ g o ] ;

define däComposeRule [ д я ] -> [ d ä ] ;
define daComposeRule [ д а ] -> [ d a ] ;
define diComposeRule [ д и ] -> [ d i ] ;
define dyComposeRule [ д ы ] -> [ d y ] ;
define düComposeRule [ д ю ] -> [ d ü ] ;
define duComposeRule [ д у ] -> [ d u ] ;
define deComposeRule [ д е ] -> [ d e ] ;
define děComposeRule [ д э ] -> [ d ě ] ;
define döComposeRule [ д ё ] -> [ d ö ] ;
define doComposeRule [ д о ] -> [ d o ] ;
define dʹComposeRule [ д ь ] -> [ d́ ] ;

define žäComposeRule [ ж я ] -> [ ž ä ] ;
define žaComposeRule [ ж а ] -> [ ž a ] ;
define žiComposeRule [ ж и ] -> [ ž i ] ;
define žyComposeRule [ ж ы ] -> [ ž y ] ;
define žüComposeRule [ ж ю ] -> [ ž ü ] ;
define žuComposeRule [ ж у ] -> [ ž u ] ;
define žeComposeRule [ ж е ] -> [ ž e ] ;
define žěComposeRule [ ж э ] -> [ ž ě ] ;
define žöComposeRule [ ж ё ] -> [ ž ö ] ;
define žoComposeRule [ ж о ] -> [ ž o ] ;

define zäComposeRule [ з я ] -> [ z ä ] ;
define zaComposeRule [ з а ] -> [ z a ] ;
define ziComposeRule [ з и ] -> [ z i ] ;
define zyComposeRule [ з ы ] -> [ z y ] ;
define züComposeRule [ з ю ] -> [ z ü ] ;
define zuComposeRule [ з у ] -> [ z u ] ;
define zeComposeRule [ з е ] -> [ z e ] ;
define zěComposeRule [ з э ] -> [ z ě ] ;
define zöComposeRule [ з ё ] -> [ z ö ] ;
define zoComposeRule [ з о ] -> [ z o ] ;
define źComposeRule [ з ь ] -> [ ź ] ;

define jäComposeRule [ й я ] -> [ j ä ] ;
define jaComposeRule [ й а ] -> [ j a ] ;
define jiComposeRule [ й и ] -> [ j i ] ;
define jyComposeRule [ й ы ] -> [ j y ] ;
define jüComposeRule [ й ю ] -> [ j ü ] ;
define juComposeRule [ й у ] -> [ j u ] ;
define jeComposeRule [ й е ] -> [ j e ] ;
define jěComposeRule [ й э ] -> [ j ě ] ;
define jöComposeRule [ й ё ] -> [ j ö ] ;
define joComposeRule [ й о ] -> [ j o ] ;

define käComposeRule [ к я ] -> [ k ä ] ;
define kaComposeRule [ к а ] -> [ k a ] ;
define kiComposeRule [ к и ] -> [ k i ] ;
define kyComposeRule [ к ы ] -> [ k y ] ;
define küComposeRule [ к ю ] -> [ k ü ] ;
define kuComposeRule [ к у ] -> [ k u ] ;
define keComposeRule [ к е ] -> [ k e ] ;
define kěComposeRule [ к э ] -> [ k ě ] ;
define köComposeRule [ к ё ] -> [ k ö ] ;
define koComposeRule [ к о ] -> [ k o ] ;

define läComposeRule [ л я ] -> [ l ä ] ;
define laComposeRule [ л а ] -> [ l a ] ;
define liComposeRule [ л и ] -> [ l i ] ;
define lyComposeRule [ л ы ] -> [ l y ] ;
define lüComposeRule [ л ю ] -> [ l ü ] ;
define luComposeRule [ л у ] -> [ l u ] ;
define leComposeRule [ л е ] -> [ l e ] ;
define lěComposeRule [ л э ] -> [ l ě ] ;
define löComposeRule [ л ё ] -> [ l ö ] ;
define loComposeRule [ л о ] -> [ l o ] ;
define ĺComposeRule [ л ь ] -> [ ĺ ] ;

define mäComposeRule [ м я ] -> [ m ä ] ;
define maComposeRule [ м а ] -> [ m a ] ;
define miComposeRule [ м и ] -> [ m i ] ;
define myComposeRule [ м ы ] -> [ m y ] ;
define müComposeRule [ м ю ] -> [ m ü ] ;
define muComposeRule [ м у ] -> [ m u ] ;
define meComposeRule [ м е ] -> [ m e ] ;
define měComposeRule [ м э ] -> [ m ě ] ;
define möComposeRule [ м ё ] -> [ m ö ] ;
define moComposeRule [ м о ] -> [ m o ] ;

define näComposeRule [ н я ] -> [ n ä ] ;
define naComposeRule [ н а ] -> [ n a ] ;
define niComposeRule [ н и ] -> [ n i ] ;
define nyComposeRule [ н ы ] -> [ n y ] ;
define nüComposeRule [ н ю ] -> [ n ü ] ;
define nuComposeRule [ н у ] -> [ n u ] ;
define neComposeRule [ н е ] -> [ n e ] ;
define něComposeRule [ н э ] -> [ n ě ] ;
define nöComposeRule [ н ё ] -> [ n ö ] ;
define noComposeRule [ н о ] -> [ n o ] ;
define ńComposeRule [ н ь ] -> [ ń ] ;

define päComposeRule [ п я ] -> [ p ä ] ;
define paComposeRule [ п а ] -> [ p a ] ;
define piComposeRule [ п и ] -> [ p i ] ;
define pyComposeRule [ п ы ] -> [ p y ] ;
define püComposeRule [ п ю ] -> [ p ü ] ;
define puComposeRule [ п у ] -> [ p u ] ;
define peComposeRule [ п е ] -> [ p e ] ;
define pěComposeRule [ п э ] -> [ p ě ] ;
define pöComposeRule [ п ё ] -> [ p ö ] ;
define poComposeRule [ п о ] -> [ p o ] ;

define räComposeRule [ р я ] -> [ r ä ] ;
define raComposeRule [ р а ] -> [ r a ] ;
define riComposeRule [ р и ] -> [ r i ] ;
define ryComposeRule [ р ы ] -> [ r y ] ;
define rüComposeRule [ р ю ] -> [ r ü ] ;
define ruComposeRule [ р у ] -> [ r u ] ;
define reComposeRule [ р е ] -> [ r e ] ;
define rěComposeRule [ р э ] -> [ r ě ] ;
define röComposeRule [ р ё ] -> [ r ö ] ;
define roComposeRule [ р о ] -> [ r o ] ;
define ŕComposeRule [ р ь ] -> [ ŕ ] ;

define säComposeRule [ с я ] -> [ s ä ] ;
define saComposeRule [ с а ] -> [ s a ] ;
define siComposeRule [ с и ] -> [ s i ] ;
define syComposeRule [ с ы ] -> [ s y ] ;
define süComposeRule [ с ю ] -> [ s ü ] ;
define suComposeRule [ с у ] -> [ s u ] ;
define seComposeRule [ с е ] -> [ s e ] ;
define sěComposeRule [ с э ] -> [ s ě ] ;
define söComposeRule [ с ё ] -> [ s ö ] ;
define soComposeRule [ с о ] -> [ s o ] ;
define śComposeRule [ с ь ] -> [ ś ] ;

define täComposeRule [ т я ] -> [ t ä ] ;
define taComposeRule [ т а ] -> [ t a ] ;
define tiComposeRule [ т и ] -> [ t i ] ;
define tyComposeRule [ т ы ] -> [ t y ] ;
define tüComposeRule [ т ю ] -> [ t ü ] ;
define tuComposeRule [ т у ] -> [ t u ] ;
define teComposeRule [ т е ] -> [ t e ] ;
define těComposeRule [ т э ] -> [ t ě ] ;
define töComposeRule [ т ё ] -> [ t ö ] ;
define toComposeRule [ т о ] -> [ t o ] ;
define tʹComposeRule [ т ь ] -> [ t́ ] ;

define fäComposeRule [ ф я ] -> [ f ä ] ;
define faComposeRule [ ф а ] -> [ f a ] ;
define fiComposeRule [ ф и ] -> [ f i ] ;
define fyComposeRule [ ф ы ] -> [ f y ] ;
define füComposeRule [ ф ю ] -> [ f ü ] ;
define fuComposeRule [ ф у ] -> [ f u ] ;
define feComposeRule [ ф е ] -> [ f e ] ;
define fěComposeRule [ ф э ] -> [ f ě ] ;
define föComposeRule [ ф ё ] -> [ f ö ] ;
define foComposeRule [ ф о ] -> [ f o ] ;

define xäComposeRule [ х я ] -> [ x ä ] ;
define xaComposeRule [ х а ] -> [ x a ] ;
define xiComposeRule [ х и ] -> [ x i ] ;
define xyComposeRule [ х ы ] -> [ x y ] ;
define xüComposeRule [ х ю ] -> [ x ü ] ;
define xuComposeRule [ х у ] -> [ x u ] ;
define xeComposeRule [ х е ] -> [ x e ] ;
define xěComposeRule [ х э ] -> [ x ě ] ;
define xöComposeRule [ х ё ] -> [ x ö ] ;
define xoComposeRule [ х о ] -> [ x o ] ;

define cäComposeRule [ ц я ] -> [ c ä ] ;
define caComposeRule [ ц а ] -> [ c a ] ;
define ciComposeRule [ ц и ] -> [ c i ] ;
define cyComposeRule [ ц ы ] -> [ c y ] ;
define cüComposeRule [ ц ю ] -> [ c ü ] ;
define cuComposeRule [ ц у ] -> [ c u ] ;
define ceComposeRule [ ц е ] -> [ c e ] ;
define cěComposeRule [ ц э ] -> [ c ě ] ;
define cöComposeRule [ ц ё ] -> [ c ö ] ;
define coComposeRule [ ц о ] -> [ c o ] ;
define ćComposeRule [ ц ь ] -> [ ć ] ;

define čäComposeRule [ ч я ] -> [ č ä ] ;
define čaComposeRule [ ч а ] -> [ č a ] ;
define čiComposeRule [ ч и ] -> [ č i ] ;
define čyComposeRule [ ч ы ] -> [ č y ] ;
define čüComposeRule [ ч ю ] -> [ č ü ] ;
define čuComposeRule [ ч у ] -> [ č u ] ;
define čeComposeRule [ ч е ] -> [ č e ] ;
define čěComposeRule [ ч э ] -> [ č ě ] ;
define čöComposeRule [ ч ё ] -> [ č ö ] ;
define čoComposeRule [ ч о ] -> [ č o ] ;

define šäComposeRule [ ш я ] -> [ š ä ] ;
define šaComposeRule [ ш а ] -> [ š a ] ;
define šiComposeRule [ ш и ] -> [ š i ] ;
define šyComposeRule [ ш ы ] -> [ š y ] ;
define šüComposeRule [ ш ю ] -> [ š ü ] ;
define šuComposeRule [ ш у ] -> [ š u ] ;
define šeComposeRule [ ш е ] -> [ š e ] ;
define šěComposeRule [ ш э ] -> [ š ě ] ;
define šöComposeRule [ ш ё ] -> [ š ö ] ;
define šoComposeRule [ ш о ] -> [ š o ] ;

define ŝäComposeRule [ щ я ] -> [ ŝ ä ] ;
define ŝaComposeRule [ щ а ] -> [ ŝ a ] ;
define ŝiComposeRule [ щ и ] -> [ ŝ i ] ;
define ŝyComposeRule [ щ ы ] -> [ ŝ y ] ;
define ŝüComposeRule [ щ ю ] -> [ ŝ ü ] ;
define ŝuComposeRule [ щ у ] -> [ ŝ u ] ;
define ŝeComposeRule [ щ е ] -> [ ŝ e ] ;
define ŝěComposeRule [ щ э ] -> [ ŝ ě ] ;
define ŝöComposeRule [ щ ё ] -> [ ŝ ö ] ;
define ŝoComposeRule [ щ о ] -> [ ŝ o ] ;

! Word-initial

define jaComposeRule [ .#. я ] -> [ .#. j a ] ;
define joComposeRule [ .#. ё ] -> [ .#. j o ] ;
define juComposeRule [ .#. ю ] -> [ .#. j u ] ;

! After vowel

define äjaComposeRule [ я я ] -> [ ä j a ] ;
define ajaComposeRule [ а я ] -> [ a j a ] ;
define öjaComposeRule [ ё я ] -> [ ö j a ] ;
define ojaComposeRule [ о я ] -> [ o j a ] ;
define üjaComposeRule [ ю я ] -> [ ü j a ] ;
define ujaComposeRule [ у я ] -> [ u j a ] ;
define ejaComposeRule [ е я ] -> [ e j a ] ;
define ějaComposeRule [ э я ] -> [ ě j a ] ;
define ijaComposeRule [ и я ] -> [ i j a ] ;
define yjaComposeRule [ ы я ] -> [ y j a ] ;

define äjoComposeRule [ я я ] -> [ ä j o ] ;
define ajoComposeRule [ а я ] -> [ a j o ] ;
define öjoComposeRule [ ё я ] -> [ ö j o ] ;
define ojoComposeRule [ о я ] -> [ o j o ] ;
define üjoComposeRule [ ю я ] -> [ ü j o ] ;
define ujoComposeRule [ у я ] -> [ u j o ] ;
define ejoComposeRule [ е я ] -> [ e j o ] ;
define ějoComposeRule [ э я ] -> [ ě j o ] ;
define ijoComposeRule [ и я ] -> [ i j o ] ;
define yjoComposeRule [ ы я ] -> [ y j o ] ;

define äjuComposeRule [ я я ] -> [ ä j u ] ;
define ajuComposeRule [ а я ] -> [ a j u ] ;
define öjuComposeRule [ ё я ] -> [ ö j u ] ;
define ojuComposeRule [ о я ] -> [ o j u ] ;
define üjuComposeRule [ ю я ] -> [ ü j u ] ;
define ujuComposeRule [ у я ] -> [ u j u ] ;
define ejuComposeRule [ е я ] -> [ e j u ] ;
define ějuComposeRule [ э я ] -> [ ě j u ] ;
define ijuComposeRule [ и я ] -> [ i j u ] ;
define yjuComposeRule [ ы я ] -> [ y j u ] ;

! single letters

define aRule [ а ] -> [ a ] ;
define bRule [ б ] -> [ b ] ;
define vRule [ в ] -> [ v ] ;
define gRule [ г ] -> [ g ] ;
define dRule [ д ] -> [ d ] ;
define eRule [ е ] -> [ e ] ;
define öRule [ ё ] -> [ ö ] ;
define žRule [ ж ] -> [ ž ] ;
define zRule [ з ] -> [ z ] ;
define iRule [ и ] -> [ i ] ;
define jRule [ й ] -> [ j ] ;
define kRule [ к ] -> [ k ] ;
define lRule [ л ] -> [ l ] ;
define mRule [ м ] -> [ m ] ;
define nRule [ н ] -> [ n ] ;
define oRule [ о ] -> [ o ] ;
define pRule [ п ] -> [ p ] ;
define rRule [ р ] -> [ r ] ;
define sRule [ с ] -> [ s ] ;
define tRule [ т ] -> [ t ] ;
define uRule [ у ] -> [ u ] ;
define fRule [ ф ] -> [ f ] ;
define xRule [ х ] -> [ x ] ;
define cRule [ ц ] -> [ c ] ;
define čRule [ ч ] -> [ č ] ;
define šRule [ ш ] -> [ š ] ;
define ŝRule [ щ ] -> [ ŝ ] ;
define ʺRule [ ъ ] -> [ ʺ ] ;
define yRule [ ы ] -> [ y ] ;
define ʹRule [ ь ] -> [ ʹ ] ;
define ěRule [ э ] -> [ ě ] ;
define üRule [ ю ] -> [ ü ] ;
define äRule [ я ] -> [ ä ] ;

! read
read regex [ BäComposeRule
.o. BaComposeRule
.o. BiComposeRule
.o. ByComposeRule
.o. BüComposeRule
.o. BuComposeRule
.o. BeComposeRule
.o. BěComposeRule
.o. BöComposeRule
.o. BoComposeRule
